Massachusetts, session 194th, H740.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 71 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 37R the
following section:-
Section 37S. (a) For the purposes of this section “school branding” shall mean any name,
symbol or image used by a school as a mascot, nickname, logo, letterhead, team name, slogan,
motto or other identifier.
(b) Prior to any change in school branding where the current school branding references
any person, group of persons, organization, race, creed, color, national origin, sexual orientation
or gender identity, the school committee for the school district that the school belongs to shall
hold a hearing on the proposed school branding change. The hearing shall be open to the public
and at least 1 representative of the group, organization or identity referenced in the school
of 2

branding shall be in attendance at the hearing and shall be given the opportunity to speak on the
proposed school branding change.
(c) The commissioner shall adopt rules and regulations to carry out this section.
of 2